Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-160.02
Near beer; regulation.

The manufacture, distribution, sale, and purchase of near beer shall be subject to all provisions of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, except taxation provisions, to which the manufacture, distribution, sale, and purchase of beer are subject.

Laws 1989, LB 441, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 53-145;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 45.